Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-2613
State Treasurer;
disbursements for administration.

The State Treasurer
shall place all sums of money received under sections 77-2601 to 77-2615 as
provided in section 77-2602, and from time to time, upon voucher approved
by the Tax Commissioner, disburse such sum or sums as may be necessary to
administer and carry out the provisions of sections 77-2601 to 77-2615 relating
to the collection of the tax, subject to the limitations provided in such sections.

Laws 1947, c. 267, § 13, p. 865;

Laws 1949, c. 245, § 3, p. 666;

Laws 1959, c. 353, § 9, p. 1247;

Laws 1965, c. 501, § 6, p. 1599;

Laws 1965, c. 500, § 4, p. 1593;

Laws 2011, LB590, § 33.